Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20142-2642
Commercial, noncommercial, and private
applicator licenses; expiration; renewal; procedure; noncertified applicator;
restrictions.

(1) Each commercial, noncommercial, and private
applicator license shall expire on April 15 following the third year in which
it was issued.

(2) Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, a person having
a valid commercial or noncommercial applicator license may renew the license
for another three-year period by:

(a) Paying to the department an amount equal to the license fee required
by section 2-2638 for commercial applicator licenses or section 2-2639 for
noncommercial applicator licenses, if any; and

(b)(i) Undertaking the training approved by the department; or

(ii) Submitting to retesting prior to renewal of the license.

(3) Any person who allows his or her commercial or noncommercial applicator
license to expire shall be required to submit to testing prior to the renewal
of the license.

(4) The application for renewal of a private applicator license shall
be the same as the application for an initial license.

(5) Notwithstanding sections 2-2636 to 2-2642, any individual required
to be a licensed certified applicator may use pesticides as a noncertified
applicator for only one consecutive sixty-day period of time if:

(a) The individual or his or her employer applies to the department
for a license as a licensed certified applicator within ten days of making
the first pesticide use. Such license application shall include the name and
license number of the licensed certified applicator who is supervising the
noncertified applicator;

(b) All pesticide uses made by an individual as a noncertified applicator
are made under the direct supervision of a licensed certified applicator;
and

(c) The licensed certified applicator provides such training and supervision
as is necessary to:

(i) Determine the level of experience and knowledge of the noncertified
applicator in the use of a pesticide;

(ii) Provide verifiable, detailed guidance on how to conduct each individual
pesticide use performed under his or her direct supervision;

(iii) Accompany the noncertified applicator to at least one site which
would be typical of each type of pesticide use that the noncertified applicator
performs;

(iv) Be accessible by voice or electronic means to provide further instructions
at all times during the noncertified applicator's use of the pesticide; and

(v) Be able to be physically on the site, should the need arise, where
the pesticide use or storage is taking place within a reasonable period of
time as established by the director by rules and regulations. Both the licensed
certified applicator and noncertified applicator shall be responsible for
the acts of the noncertified applicator and each shall be subject to all fines, license actions, and other enforcement actions prescribed
by the Pesticide Act for violations under the act. The department may deny or suspend the
use of pesticides by a noncertified applicator if it has reasonable cause
to believe that such person may not become eligible to become a licensed certified
applicator or uses any pesticide in violation of the act.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 21;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 16;

Laws 2013, LB69, § 10.